Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,287.01
Nitrous oxide use prohibited.

It is unlawful to use nitrous oxide in any motor vehicle operated on any highway in this state.

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 11.